South Dakota, session 2026, SB227.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 58-12:
An insurer may not declare that a motor vehicle is a total loss because of damage
caused by a collision, fire, vandalism, weather, or other peril, unless the cost of repairing
the vehicle meets or exceeds seventy-five percent of the actual cash value of the vehicle
before it was damaged.
Nothing in this section prohibits an insurer from declaring, at the request of and
with the express written authorization of the vehicle owner, that the vehicle is a total loss,
even if the cost to repair the vehicle is less than seventy-five percent of the actual cash
value of the vehicle immediately preceding the time it was damaged.
For purposes of this section, “actual cash value” means the current market value
of the motor vehicle, within a radius of two-hundred miles from the primary address of
the vehicle owner, taking into consideration:
(1) The year, make, and model of the vehicle;
(2) Any accessories and options;
(3) Any natural deterioration from normal use;
(4) The odometer reading; and
(5) The accident history of the vehicle.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.